Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB8.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 278 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Public Service Commission shall consist of five (5) members as follows:
(a) Three (3) members appointed the Governor:
1. One (1) of whom shall be a licensed attorney who has actively
practiced law in the Commonwealth for at least seven (7) years;
2. Two (2) of whom shall have education or training, and five (5) years
of actual experience, in one (1) or more of the following fields:
a. Economics;
b. Engineering;
c. Accounting;
d. Finance;
e. Utility regulation;
f. Pipeline or utility infrastructure safety;
g. Business management; or
h. Environmental management; and
(b) Two (2) members appointed by the Auditor of Public Accounts:
1. One (1) of whom shall have at least five (5) years of actual experience
as a consumer advocate; and
2. One (1) of whom shall have the same qualifications as required under
paragraph (a)2. of this subsection.
(2) No two (2) members of the commission shall have the same occupation or
profession, and no more than three (3) commissioners shall be of the same
political party.
(3) Appointments and reappointments to the commission shall be subject to
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 929
confirmation by the Senate as provided in KRS 11.160.
(4) The commissioners shall elect one (1) of the commissioners to act as the
commission's chair. The chair shall be the chief executive officer of the
commission. The chair shall designate one (1) of the commissioners to serve as
vice chair to act for the chair in his or her absence.
(5) Vacancies for unexpired terms shall be filled in the same manner as the original
appointments, but the appointee shall hold office only until the end of the
unexpired term and shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate as provided in
KRS 11.160.
(6) Members of the commission shall serve no more than three (3) terms, but any
terms or partial terms served prior to the effective date of this Act shall not be
counted toward the term limits established by this subsection.
(7) After the initial appointments, a member of the commission shall serve for a term
of four (4) years and until a successor is appointed and qualified.
(8) Each member of the commission shall be a full-time employee as defined in KRS
18A.005.
Section 2. KRS 278.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Public Service Commission shall constitute an independent department of
state government within the meaning of KRS Chapter 12, and shall be
administratively attached to the Energy and Environment Cabinet only for those
limited functions and purposes expressly requested by the commission to be
performed by the Energy and Environment Cabinet. The commission shall have
sole discretion as to which functions shall be deemed necessary for its efficient
operation. The commission shall consist of an executive director, five (5)
commissioners, and other agents and employees as necessary to carry out its
obligations under this chapter.
(2) Notwithstanding Section 7 of this Act, the commission may, in its sole discretion,
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 929
identify and determine the compensation for categories of its professional
employees at the amounts it deems necessary to recruit and retain employees who
have the experience, expertise, and education required to perform their job
responsibilities with the commission.
(3) The[ Public Service] commission shall regulate utilities,[ and] enforce the
provisions of this chapter and the rules and administrative regulations
promulgated hereunder, and exercise all powers necessary incident thereto. The
commission shall be a body corporate, with power to sue and be sued in its
corporate name. The commission may adopt a seal bearing the name "Public
Service Commission of Kentucky," which seal shall be affixed to all writs and
official documents, and to such other instruments as the commission directs, and all
courts shall take judicial note of the seal.
(4)[(2)] The jurisdiction of the commission shall extend to all utilities in this state. The
commission shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the regulation of rates and
service of utilities, but with that exception nothing in this chapter is intended to
limit or restrict the police jurisdiction, contract rights or powers of cities or political
subdivisions.
(5)[(3)] The commission may adopt, in keeping with KRS Chapter 13A, reasonable
administrative regulations to implement the provisions of KRS Chapter 278 and
investigate the methods and practices of utilities to require them to conform to the
laws of this state, and to all reasonable rules, regulations and orders of the
commission not contrary to law.
(6) The commission shall not be subject to reorganization under KRS Chapter 12.
Section 3. KRS 278.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each commissioner shall be a resident and qualified voter of this state, not less than
twenty-five (25) years of age at the time of his or her appointment and
qualification, and shall have resided in this state for at least three (3) years prior to
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 929
his or her appointment and qualification. Each commissioner shall take and
subscribe to the constitutional oath of office, which shall be recorded in the office
of the Secretary of State.
(2) No person shall be appointed to or hold the office of commissioner who holds, or
whose immediate family member holds, any official relationship to any utility, or
who owns any stocks or bonds thereof, or who has any pecuniary interest therein,
except for a pension or retirement savings account if no contributions have been
made to it for at least one (1) year prior to the appointment.
(3) No commissioner shall receive any rebate, pass, percentage of contract or other
thing of value from any utility.
(4) In addition to the restrictions on members of the commission set forth in Section 1
of this Act[KRS 278.050(1)], no commissioner shall engage in any occupation or
business inconsistent with his duties as such commissioner.
(5) If any commissioner becomes a member of any political party committee, his or her
office as commissioner shall be thereby vacated.
[(6) In making appointments to the commission, the Governor shall consider the various
kinds of expertise relevant to utility regulation and the varied interests to be
protected by the commission, including those of consumers as well as utility
investors, and no more than two (2) members shall be of the same occupation or
profession.]
Section 4. KRS 278.070 is amended to read as follows:
The officer who appointed the commissioner[Governor] may remove the[any]
commissioner for cause, after giving him or her a copy of the charges against him or her
and an opportunity of being publicly heard in person or by counsel in his or her own
defense upon not less than ten (10) days' notice. If a commissioner is removed, the officer
who appointed the commissioner[Governor] shall file in the office of the Secretary of
State a complete statement of all charges against the commissioner and his or her
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 929
findings thereon, and a complete record of the proceedings. Any commissioner so
removed may bring action in the proper court to determine whether or not he or she was
legally removed in accordance with this section.
Section 5. KRS 278.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The chair[chairman] and the other [two (2)] members of the commission shall be
paid a salary fixed under KRS 64.640 to be paid monthly.
(2) Notwithstanding Section 7 of this Act, the executive director of the commission
shall be paid a salary to be fixed solely by the commission[, with the approval of the
Governor].
(3) The commissioners, the executive director, and employees of the commission are
entitled to all expenses, including hotel bills, incurred in traveling on business of
the commission.
(4) The salaries and expenses provided for by this section, and all other expenses of the
commission incurred in the administration of this chapter, shall be paid out of
appropriations as provided by law out of the general expenditure fund.
Section 6. KRS 278.702 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established the Kentucky State Board on Electric Generation and
Transmission Siting. The board shall be composed of nine (9)[seven (7)] members
as follows:
(a) The five (5)[three (3)] members of the Kentucky Public Service Commission;
(b) The secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet or the secretary's
designee;
(c) The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or the secretary's
designee;
(d) 1. If the facility subject to board approval is proposed to be located in one
(1) county, two (2) ad hoc public members to be appointed by the
Governor from a county where a facility subject to board approval is
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 929
proposed to be located:
a. One (1) of the ad hoc public members shall be the chairman of the
planning commission with jurisdiction over an area in which a
facility subject to board approval is proposed to be located. If the
proposed location is not within a jurisdiction with a planning
commission, then the Governor shall appoint either the county
judge/executive of a county that contains the proposed location of
the facility or the mayor of a city, if the facility is proposed to be
within a city; and
b. One (1) of the ad hoc public members shall be appointed by the
Governor and shall be a resident of the county in which the facility
is proposed to be located.
2. If the facility subject to board approval is proposed to be located in more
than one (1) county, two (2) ad hoc public members to be chosen as
follows:
a. One (1) ad hoc public member shall be the county judge/executive
of a county in which the facility is proposed to be located, to be
chosen by majority vote of the county judge/executives of the
counties in which the facility is proposed to be located; and
b. One (1) ad hoc public member shall be a resident of a county in
which the facility is proposed to be located, and shall be appointed
by the Governor.
If a member has not been chosen by majority vote, as provided in
subdivision a. of this subparagraph, by thirty (30) days after the filing of
the application, the Governor shall directly appoint the member.
3. Ad hoc public members appointed to the board shall have no direct
financial interest in the facility proposed to be constructed.
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 929
(2) The term of service for the ad hoc members of the board shall continue until the
merchant electric generating facility for which they were appointed has been
constructed and begins generating electricity for sale or the construction certificate
expires. The remaining members of the board shall be permanent members.
(3) The board shall be attached to the Public Service Commission for administrative
purposes. The commission staff shall serve as permanent administrative staff for the
board. The members of the board identified in subsection (1)(a) to (d) of this
section shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement KRS 278.700 to 278.716.
(4) No member of the board shall receive any salary or fee for service on the board or
shall have any financial interest in any facility the application for which comes
before the board, but each member shall be reimbursed for actual travel and
expenses directly related to service on the board.
(5) The chair[chairman] of the Public Service Commission shall be the
chair[chairman] of the board. The chair[chairman] shall designate one (1) member
of the board as vice chair[chairman]. A majority of the members of the board shall
constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. No vacancy on the board shall
impair the right of the remaining members to exercise all of the powers of the
board. The board shall convene upon the call of the chair[chairman].
Section 7. KRS 64.640 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, and excepting
officers elected by popular vote, employees of the General Assembly, including
employees of the Legislative Research Commission, members of boards and
commissions, those officers and employees of Kentucky Educational Television
exempt from classified service as provided in KRS 18A.115, presidents and
employees of the state universities and the state colleges, officers employed by the
Department of Kentucky State Police under KRS Chapter 16, employees whose
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 929
compensation is set by the Public Service Commission under subsection (2) of
Section 2 of this Act and subsection (2) of Section 5 of this Act, and persons
employed by the commissioner of parks on a temporary basis under KRS 148.026,
the Personnel Cabinet shall prepare schedules of compensation, payable out of the
State Treasury, with a minimum salary rate, and other salary rates as are deemed
necessary or advisable, for the office or position of employment of every state
officer and employee, including specifically the offices and positions of
employment in every constitutional administrative department, statutory
administrative department, independent agency, board, commission, or other unit of
state government. The language of any statute empowering a board, commission,
authority, or other administrative body for which the Personnel Cabinet provides
personnel and payroll services, except for any board governing any of the Kentucky
Retirement Systems, the County Employees Retirement System, the Kentucky
Public Pensions Authority, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority,
the Kentucky Authority for Educational Television, or the Council on
Postsecondary Education, to establish, set, or approve the salaries of its
administrative head and other employees to the contrary notwithstanding, the
establishment or setting of salaries for administrative heads or other employees
shall be subject to the approval of the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet. The
schedules and rates shall be based upon studies of the duties and responsibilities of
the offices and positions and upon a comparison with rates being paid for similar or
comparable services elsewhere, and in the preparation of such schedules, the
Personnel Cabinet shall ascertain and record the duties, responsibilities, and
authority pertaining to the various offices and positions in the state service, and
classify such positions in the manner provided in KRS 18A.030, 18A.035, 18A.110,
18A.130, 18A.135, and 18A.150 to 18A.160. No such schedule shall become
effective until it has been approved by the Governor by executive order.
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 929
(2) The Governor shall set the compensation payable out of the State Treasury to each
officer or position in the state service, which officer or position heads a statutory
administrative department, independent agency, or other unit of state government,
except for those excluded under subsection (1) of this section. Such compensation
shall be based upon studies of the duties and responsibilities and classification of
the positions by the Governor and upon a comparison with compensation being paid
for similar or comparable services elsewhere, provided, however, such
compensation shall not exceed the total taxable compensation of the Governor
derived from state sources, the provisions of KRS 64.660 to the contrary
notwithstanding. For the purposes of this section, the total taxable compensation of
the Governor from state sources shall include the amount provided for
compensation to the Governor under KRS 64.480 and any benefits or discretionary
spending accounts that are imputed as taxable income for federal tax purposes.
(3) The compensation payable out of the State Treasury to officers and employees
subordinate to any office or position covered by subsection (2) of this section shall
not exceed the maximum rate established pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
for such office or position, except with respect to physicians as provided in KRS
64.655 and employees of the Public Service Commission not otherwise exempt
from the requirements of this section under subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act
and subsection (2) of Section 5 of this Act[of Kentucky] whose compensation shall
be fixed, within constitutional limits, by the Personnel Cabinet with the approval of
the Governor as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Nothing in this section shall preclude the allowance of maintenance to officers and
employees of the state.
Section 8. KRS 160.617 is amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding KRS 278.040(4)[(2)], or any other provision to the contrary, any utility,
cable service provider, or satellite broadcast and wireless cable service provider required
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 929
to pay the tax authorized by KRS 160.613 or 160.614 may increase its rates in any school
district in which it is required to pay the school tax by the amount of the school tax
imposed, up to three percent (3%). Any utility, cable service provider, or satellite [
]broadcast and wireless cable service provider so increasing its rates shall separately state
on the bills sent to its customers the amount of the increase and shall identify the amount
as: "Rate increase for school tax."
Section 9. The following KRS section is repealed:
278.050 Membership of Public Service Commission -- Appointment -- Terms --
Chairman -- Vacancies.
Section 10. (1) On or before July 1, 2025, the Auditor of Public Accounts
shall appoint one member of the Public Service Commission for a term expiring July 1,
2026, and one member of the Public Service Commission for a term expiring July 1,
2027.
(2) All current members of the Public Service Commission on the effective date
of this Act may serve out the remainder of their terms, provided that they meet the
qualification requirements in Sections 1 and 3 of this Act. The term of any current
member of the Public Service Commission who does not meet the qualification
requirements in Sections 1 and 3 of this Act shall be terminated, and the Governor shall
appoint a replacement subject to confirmation by the Senate pursuant to Section 1 of this
Act.
(3) On the effective date of this Act, copies of any records, files, or documents,
including legal documents or memoranda, associated with functions of the Public Service
Commission that were previously performed by the Energy and Environment Cabinet but
for which it is no longer deemed responsible, shall be transmitted to the commission.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:05 PM Jacketed